Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-1631.02
Local boards of health; retirement
plan; reports.

(1) Beginning December 31, 1998, and each
year thereafter, the health director of a board of health with an independent
retirement plan established pursuant to section 71-1631 and section 401(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code shall file with the Public Employees Retirement
Board an annual report on such plan and shall submit copies of such report
to the Auditor of Public Accounts. The Auditor of Public Accounts
may prepare a review of such report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not
required to do so. The annual report shall be in a form prescribed
by the Public Employees Retirement Board and shall contain the following information
for each such retirement plan:

(a) The number of persons participating in the retirement plan;

(b) The contribution rates of participants in the plan;

(c) Plan assets and liabilities;

(d) The names and positions of persons administering the plan;

(e) The names and positions of persons investing plan assets;

(f) The form and nature of investments;

(g) For each independent defined contribution plan, a full description
of investment policies and options available to plan participants; and

(h) For each independent defined benefit plan, the levels of benefits
of participants in the plan, the number of members who are eligible for a
benefit, and the total present value of such members' benefits, as well as
the funding sources which will pay for such benefits.

If an independent plan contains no current active participants, the
health director may file in place of such report a statement with the Public
Employees Retirement Board indicating the number of retirees still drawing
benefits, and the sources and amount of funding for such benefits.

(2) Beginning December 31, 1998, and every four years thereafter, if
such retirement plan is a defined benefit plan, a board of health with an
independent retirement plan established pursuant to section 71-1631 shall
cause to be prepared a quadrennial report and the health director shall file
the same with the Public Employees Retirement Board and submit to the Auditor
of Public Accounts a copy of such report. The Auditor of Public Accounts may prepare a review of such
report pursuant to section 84-304.02 but is not required to do so. The
report shall consist of a full actuarial analysis of each such independent
retirement plan established pursuant to section 71-1631. The analysis shall
be prepared by an independent private organization or public entity employing
actuaries who are members in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries,
and which organization or entity has demonstrated expertise to perform this
type of analysis and is unrelated to any organization offering investment
advice or which provides investment management services to the retirement
plan.

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 795, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB474, § 12.